Vermont, session 2025-2026, H842.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 2102 is amended to read:
§ 2102. COMMISSION ON PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEE HEALTH
BENEFITS CREATED
* * *
(b) Composition and appointment.
(1) The Commission shall have 10 nine members, of whom five three
shall be representatives of school employees and five three shall be
representatives of school employers. The remaining members shall be:
VT LEG #386139 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.842
2026 Page 3 of 12
(A) the Secretary of Education or designee;
(B) the Commissioner of Taxes or designee; and
(C) one representative from the Vermont School Boards Insurance
Trust, appointed by the Chair of the Board of Directors of the Vermont School
Boards Insurance Trust.
(2)(A) The representatives of school employees shall be appointed as
follows:
(i) four two members appointed by the labor organization
representing the greatest number of school employees in this State; and
(ii) one member appointed by the labor organization representing
the second-greatest number of school employees in this State.
(B) The five three representatives of school employers shall be
appointed by the organization representing the majority of the public school
boards in this State.
(C) The appointing authorities shall select appointees who have an
understanding of health care and employer-employee relations and who
demonstrate a willingness to work collaboratively.
(D) The term of each member of the Commission shall be six years,
provided that of the members first appointed by the labor organization
described in subdivision (A)(i) of this subdivision (2), one appointee shall
serve a term of two years and one appointee shall serve a term of four years,
VT LEG #386139 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.842
2026 Page 4 of 12
and of the members first appointed by the organization representing the
majority of the public school boards in this State, one appointee shall serve a
term of two years and one appointee shall serve a term of four years.
(3) In the event of a vacancy, the appointing authority of the member
whose seat becomes vacant shall appoint a successor to serve out the
remainder of the member’s term.
(c) Chairs. The Commission shall be chaired jointly by one member
selected biennially by the representatives of school employees and one
member selected biennially by the representatives of school employers the
Secretary of Education or designee.
(d) Removal of Commission members. Members of the Commission may
be removed by the appointing authority of the member without cause.
(e) Decisions. All decisions of the Commission shall require the votes of a
majority of the representatives of school employees and a majority of the
representatives of school employers members present at the meeting, in person
or virtually.
* * *
(j) Alternate members.
(1) Four alternate members may be appointed Any appointing authority
may appoint one alternate member to the Commission.
VT LEG #386139 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.842
2026 Page 5 of 12
(2) Up to two alternate members may be appointed by representatives
of school employees and up to two members may be appointed by
representatives of school employers. [Repealed.]
(3) The term of each alternate member, if appointed, shall be six years.
(4) An alternate member may serve temporarily in the role as a member
appointed under subsection (b) of this section only in the absence of an
appointed member and shall not otherwise have participation or voting rights
in Commission business.
(5) An alternate member shall may be appointed to be a full member of
the Commission by the alternate member’s appointing authority upon the
resignation or removal of a full member.
* * *
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 2103 is amended to read:
§ 2103. DUTIES OF THE COMMISSION
(a) The Commission shall determine the percentage of the premium for
individual, two-person, parent-child, and family coverage under a health
benefit plan that shall be borne by each school employer and the percentage
that shall be borne by participating employees.
(1) The premium responsibility percentages shall remain in effect for the
entire plan year.
VT LEG #386139 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.842
2026 Page 6 of 12
(2) Each school employer shall be responsible for paying, on behalf of
all of its participating employees, the applicable percentages of premium costs
as determined by the Commission.
(3) [Repealed.]
(b)(1) The Commission shall determine the amount of participating
employees’ calendar year out-of-pocket expenses for which the school
employer and the participating employees shall be responsible, and whether
school employers shall establish a health reimbursement arrangement, a health
savings account, both, or neither, for their participating employees.
(2) The Commission also shall determine the extent to which the
employer or employee shall bear first dollar responsibility for out-of-pocket
expenses if using a health reimbursement arrangement and whether the balance
in a participating employee’s health reimbursement arrangement shall roll over
from year to year.
(3) [Repealed.]
(4) The Commission’s determinations regarding first dollar
responsibility for out-of-pocket expenses shall not increase the actuarial value
of the health benefit plans above 88 percent.
(c) The Commission may make recommendations regarding health benefit
plan design to any intermunicipal insurance association that offers health
VT LEG #386139 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.842
2026 Page 7 of 12
benefit plans to entities providing educational services pursuant to 24 V.S.A.
chapter 121, subchapter 6.
(d) Pursuant to subsections (a)–(c) of this section, the Commission shall
consider the following factors:
(1) the interests and welfare of the public;
(2) the financial ability of the Education Fund and school districts across
the State to pay the costs of the health benefit plan;
(3) comparisons of the health benefit plans for school employees with
the health benefit plans of employees in the public and private sector in
Vermont;
(4) the average consumer prices for goods and services commonly
known as the cost of living;
(5) prior and existing health care benefits and coverage for school
employees;
(6) the value and costs of the health benefit plans as compared to the
health benefit plans available through Vermont Health Connect; and
(7) the percentage increase or decrease in education spending that is
likely to occur if the negotiated health benefit plans are implemented as
compared to overall economic growth for the State of Vermont.
VT LEG #386139 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.842
2026 Page 8 of 12
(e) The Commission shall not make any determinations regarding school
employer or participating employee responsibilities with respect to stand-alone
vision or dental benefits.
(e)(f) The Commission may negotiate a statewide grievance procedure for
disputes concerning public school employee health benefits.
(f)(g) In no case shall a school employee receive cash in lieu of receipt of
health care benefits from one school employer while simultaneously receiving
health care benefits from the same or another school employer.
(g)(h) Accommodations shall be made for school employees whose
workload is shared between more than one school employer, and who may not
otherwise qualify for health care benefits from only one school employer. The
affected school employers shall determine the proportionate portion of the
shared costs of the health benefits.
Sec. 3. 16 V.S.A. § 2105 is amended to read:
§ 2105. DISPUTE RESOLUTION
(a)(1) If the Commission is unable to reach agreement by August 1, the
Commission shall meet with the fact finder selected pursuant to section 2104
of this chapter not later than August 15.
(2) The fact finder may schedule and hold additional meetings with the
Commission as necessary. The Commission shall furnish the fact finder with
VT LEG #386139 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.842
2026 Page 9 of 12
all records, papers, and information in its possession pertaining to any matter
remaining in dispute.
(3) The fact finder shall, before issuing his or her the decision, attempt
to mediate the matters remaining in dispute.
(4) If the mediation fails to produce an agreement, the fact finder shall,
on or before September 15, submit a written report to the Commission
recommending a reasonable basis for the settlement of the matters remaining in
dispute.
(b)(1) If the Commission is unable to resolve all matters remaining in
dispute within 30 days after receiving the fact finder’s report, the Commission
shall submit the matters remaining in dispute to the VLRB, arbitrator, or
arbitrators selected pursuant to section 2104 of this chapter for resolution.
(2)(A) The representatives of school employees and the representatives
of school employers shall submit to the VLRB, arbitrator, or arbitrators their
last best offer on all issues remaining in dispute prior to the VLRB or
arbitration hearing. The VLRB, arbitrator, or arbitrators shall select one of the
last best offers without amendment, submitted by the parties prior to the VLRB
or arbitration hearing in its entirety without amendment have the option to:
(i) select one of the last best offers submitted by the parties;
(ii) modify one or both of the last best offers; or
VT LEG #386139 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.842
2026 Page 10 of 12
(iii) draft an award of the arbitrator’s own design based on the
information presented at the arbitration hearing.
(B) The parties shall not be permitted to modify their last best offers
post hearing. Prior to the issuance of the decision of the VLRB, arbitrator, or
arbitrators, nothing shall prohibit the parties from settling the matters in
dispute.
(3)(A) The VLRB, arbitrator, or arbitrators shall hold a hearing on or
before November 15 at which the Commission members shall submit all
relevant evidence, documents, and written material, including a cost estimate
for the term of the proposal with a breakdown of costs borne by employers and
costs borne by employees, and each member may submit oral or written
testimony in support of his or her the member’s position on any undecided
issue that is subject to arbitration.
(B) In reaching a decision, the VLRB, arbitrator, or arbitrators shall
give weight to:
(i) the evidence, documents, written material, and arguments
presented, as well as the following factors:;
(i)(ii) the interests and welfare of the public;
(ii)(iii) the financial ability of the Education Fund and school
districts across the State to pay for the costs of health care benefits and
coverage;
VT LEG #386139 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.842
2026 Page 11 of 12
(iii)(iv) comparisons of the health care benefits of school
employees with the health care benefits of similar employees in the public and
private sectors in Vermont;
(iv)(v) the average consumer prices for goods and services
commonly known as the cost of living; and
(v)(vi) prior and existing health care benefits and coverage for
school employees;
(vii) the value of the health benefits as compared to health plans
available through Vermont Heath Connect; and
(viii) the percentage increase or decrease in education spending
that is likely to occur as compared to overall economic growth for the State of
Vermont.
(4) The VLRB, arbitrator, or arbitrators shall issue a written decision
within 30 days after the hearing, providing a full explication explanation of the
basis for the decision. The decision of the VLRB, arbitrator, or arbitrators
shall be final and binding upon the Commission and all school employees and
school employers. The decision shall not be subject to ratification.
* * *
Sec. 4. 16 V.S.A. § 2108 is amended to read:
§ 2108. DUTIES OF SCHOOL EMPLOYERS
(a) Each school employer shall:
VT LEG #386139 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.842
2026 Page 12 of 12
* * *
(b) The Agency of Education shall contract with a single third-party
provider to be used by all school employers to oversee any health
reimbursement arrangement or health savings account.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386139 v.1